Rhode Island, session 2025, SB554.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 46-27-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-27 entitled "Personal
Watercraft Safety Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-27-4. Penalties.
(a) Any person who violates §§ 46-27-2(b) or 46-27-2(h) any provision of this chapter or
who violates any rule or regulation promulgated hereunder, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and
shall be subject to a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment not to exceed
six (6) months for each such violation. The privilege to operate a personal watercraft may be
suspended for a period of up to six (6) months for each violation.
(b) Any person who violates any other provision of this chapter or who violates any
department of environmental management rule or regulation related to the operation of personal
watercraft shall be guilty of a civil violation and be subject to a fine not to exceed two hundred fifty
dollars ($250) for each violation.
(c) The Rhode Island traffic tribunal has jurisdiction over all civil infractions related to
violations of subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001506
========